Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201144-5510
Insurance; procurement
from nonadmitted insurer; when; terms and conditions; surplus lines licensee; exempt from due diligence search;
conditions.

(1) If an applicant for insurance is unable
to procure such insurance as he or she deems reasonably necessary to insure
a risk or exposure from an admitted insurer, such insurance may be procured
from a nonadmitted insurer upon the following terms and conditions:

(a) The insurance shall be
procured from a surplus lines licensee;

(b) The insurance procured
shall not include any insurance described in subdivisions (1) through (4)
of section 44-201;

(c) Not later than thirty
days after the effective date of such insurance, the insured shall provide,
in writing, his or her permission for such insurance to be written in a nonadmitted
insurer and his or her acknowledgment that, in the event of the insolvency
of such insurer, the policy will not be covered by the Nebraska Property and
Liability Insurance Guaranty Association; and

(d) Compliance with section
44-5511.

(2) A surplus
lines licensee seeking to procure or place nonadmitted insurance for an exempt
commercial purchaser whose home state is the State of Nebraska shall not be
required to make a due diligence search to determine whether the full amount
or type of insurance sought by such exempt commercial purchaser can be obtained
from admitted insurers if:

(a) The surplus lines licensee procuring
or placing the insurance has disclosed to the exempt commercial purchaser
that such insurance may or may not be available from the admitted market that
may provide greater protection with more regulatory oversight; and

(b) The exempt
commercial purchaser has subsequently requested in writing the surplus lines
licensee to procure or place such insurance for a nonadmitted insurer.

Laws 1978, LB 836, § 8;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 35;

R.S.Supp.,1990, § 44-147.02;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 10;

Laws 2011, LB70, § 7.

Nebraska Property and Liability Insurance Guaranty Association, see section 44-2404.